Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.40, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Eligible recipients; definitions; restrictions; use of funds. (a) The agency may award a grant or a loan to any recipient that qualifies under subdivision 2. The agency must not award a grant or a loan to a disqualified individual or disqualified business. (b) For the purposes of this subdivision disqualified individual means: (1) an individual who or an individual whose immediate family member made a contribution to the account in the current or prior taxable year and received a credit certificate; (2) an individual who or an individual whose immediate family member owns the housing for which the grant or loan will be used; (3) an individual who meets the following criteria: (i) the individual is an officer or principal of a business entity; and (ii) that business entity made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate; or (4) an individual who meets the following criteria: (i) the individual directly owns, controls, or holds the power to vote 20 percent or more of the outstanding securities of a business entity; and (ii) that business entity made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate. (c) For the purposes of this subdivision disqualified business means a business entity that: (1) made a contribution to the account in the current or prior taxable year and received a credit certificate; (2) has an officer or principal who is an individual who made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate; or (3) meets the following criteria: (i) the business entity is directly owned, controlled, or is subject to the power to vote 20 percent or more of the outstanding securities by an individual or business entity; and (ii) that controlling individual or business entity made a contribution to the account in the current or previous taxable year and received a credit certificate. (d) For purposes of this subdivision, "immediate family" means the taxpayer's spouse, parent or parent's spouse, sibling or sibling's spouse, or child or child's spouse. For a married couple filing a joint return, the limitations in this subdivision apply collectively to the taxpayer and spouse. (e) Before applying for a grant or loan, all recipients must sign a disclosure that the disqualifications under this subdivision do not apply. The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency must prescribe the form of the disclosure. The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency may rely on the disclosure to determine the eligibility of recipients under paragraph (a). (f) The agency may award grants or loans to a city as defined in section 462A.03, subdivision 21; a federally recognized American Indian tribe or subdivision located in Minnesota; a tribal housing corporation; a private developer; a nonprofit organization; a housing and redevelopment authority under sections 469.001 to 469.047; a public housing authority or agency authorized by law to exercise any of the powers granted by sections 469.001 to 469.047; or the owner of the housing. The provisions of subdivision 2, and paragraphs (a) to (e) and (g) of this subdivision, regarding the use of funds and eligible recipients apply to grants and loans awarded under this paragraph. (g) new text begin Except for projects receiving funding under section 462A.39, new text end eligible recipients must use the funds to serve households that meet the income limits as provided in section 462A.33, subdivision 5. Sec. 2. new text begin [462A.45] LIVED-EXPERIENCE ENGAGEMENT EXEMPTION. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, income received from lived-experience engagement is not considered income, assets, or personal property for purposes of determining eligibility or recertifying eligibility for state public assistance, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) child care assistance programs under chapter 142E; new text end new text begin (2) general assistance, Minnesota supplemental aid, and food support under chapters 142F and 256D; new text end new text begin (3) housing support under chapter 256I; new text end new text begin (4) Minnesota family investment program under chapter 142G; and new text end new text begin (5) economic assistance programs under chapter 256P. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, "lived-experience engagement" means the agency engaging with people with relevant experience identified by the agency for the purposes of (1) serving as a community reviewer of proposals submitted as part of an agency request for proposals, or (2) gathering and sharing feedback on the impact of housing programs. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner of human services must not consider wages earned from lived-experience engagement as income or assets under section 256B.056, subdivision 1a, paragraph (a); subdivision 3; or subdivision 3c, or for persons with eligibility determined under section 256B.057, subdivision 3, 3a, or 3b. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 474A.02, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Aggregate bond limitation. "Aggregate bond limitation" means deleted text begin up to 55deleted text end new text begin the greater of: (1) 30new text end percent of the reasonably expected aggregate basis of a residential rental project and the land on which the project is or will be locatednew text begin ; or (2) the maximum supportable permanent amortizing debt, subject to a maximum of 40 percent of the reasonably expected aggregate basis of a residential rental project and the land on which the project is or will be locatednew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.35, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Qualifying projects. (a) Qualifying projects include: (1) emergency rental assistance for households earning less than 80 percent of area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; (2) financial support to nonprofit affordable housing providers in their mission to provide safe, dignified, affordable and supportive housing; (3) projects designed for the purpose of construction, acquisition, rehabilitation, demolition or removal of existing structures, construction financing, permanent financing, interest rate reduction, refinancing, and gap financing of housing to provide affordable housing to households that have incomes which do not exceed, for homeownership projects, 115 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, and for rental housing projects, 80 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, except that the housing developed or rehabilitated with funds under this section must be affordable to the local work force; (4) financing the operations and management of financially distressed residential properties; (5) funding of supportive services or staff of supportive services providers for supportive housing as defined by section 462A.37, subdivision 1. Financial support to nonprofit housing providers to finance supportive housing operations may be awarded as a capitalized reserve or as an award of ongoing funding; and (6) deleted text begin costs of operatingdeleted text end emergency shelter deleted text begin facilitiesdeleted text end new text begin facility construction and operationsnew text end , including deleted text begin the costs of providing servicesdeleted text end new text begin service provisionnew text end . (b) Recipients must prioritize projects that provide affordable housing to households that have incomes which do not exceed, for homeownership projects, 80 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, and for rental housing projects, 50 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. Priority may be given to projects that: reduce disparities in home ownership; reduce housing cost burden, housing instability, or homelessness; improve the habitability of homes; create accessible housing; or create more energy- or water-efficient homes. (c) Gap financing is either: (1) the difference between the costs of the property, including acquisition, demolition, rehabilitation, and construction, and the market value of the property upon sale; or (2) the difference between the cost of the property and the amount the targeted household can afford for housing, based on industry standards and practices. (d) If aid under this section is used for demolition or removal of existing structures, the cleared land must be used for the construction of housing to be owned or rented by persons who meet the income limits of paragraph (a). (e) If an aid recipient uses the aid on new construction of a building containing more than four units, the loan recipient must construct, convert, or otherwise adapt the building to include: (1) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are accessible units, and each accessible unit includes at least one roll-in shower, water closet, and kitchen work surface meeting the requirements of section 1002 of the current State Building Code Accessibility Provisions for Dwelling Units in Minnesota; and (2) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are sensory-accessible units that include: (A) soundproofing between shared walls for first and second floor units; (B) no florescent lighting in units and common areas; (C) low-fume paint; (D) low-chemical carpet; and (E) low-chemical carpet glue in units and common areas. Nothing in this paragraph relieves a project funded by this section from meeting other applicable accessibility requirements. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 477A.35, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Use of proceeds. (a) Any funds distributed under this section must be spent on a qualifying projectnew text begin , as described in subdivision 4new text end . Funds are considered spent on a qualifying project if: (1) a tier I city or county demonstrates to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency that the city or county cannot expend funds on a qualifying project by the deleted text begin deadlinedeleted text end new text begin deadlinesnew text end imposed by deleted text begin paragraph (b)deleted text end new text begin this subdivisionnew text end due to factors outside the control of the city or county; and (2) the funds are transferred to a local housing trust fund. Funds transferred to a local housing trust fund under this paragraph must be spent on a deleted text begin project or household that meets the affordability requirements of subdivision 4, paragraph deleted text end deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin qualifying project, as described in subdivision 4new text end . (b) Funds must be deleted text begin spent by December 31 in the third year following the year after the deleted text end deleted text begin aid was received. The requirements of this paragraph are satisfied if funds are:deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end committed to a qualifying project by December 31 deleted text begin indeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end the third year following the year deleted text begin afterdeleted text end the aid was receiveddeleted text begin ;deleted text end and deleted text begin (2)deleted text end expended by December 31 deleted text begin indeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end the fourth year following the year deleted text begin afterdeleted text end the aid was received. new text begin (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), aid that a tier I city or county will spend on a qualifying affordable housing construction project under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (3), or a qualifying emergency shelter facility construction project under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (6), as documented in the most recent annual report submitted to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency under subdivision 6, must be committed to the project by December 31 of the fifth year following the year the aid was received and expended by December 31 of the sixth year following the year the aid was received. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end An aid recipient may not use aid money to reimburse itself for prior expenditures. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Any program income generated from funds distributed under this section must be used on a qualifying projectnew text begin , as described in subdivision 4new text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.35, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Administration. (a) The commissioner of revenue must compute the amount of aid payable to each tier I city and county under this section. By August 1 of each year, the commissioner must certify the distribution factors of each tier I city and county to be used in the following year. The commissioner must pay local affordable housing aid annually at the times provided in section 477A.015, distributing the amounts available on the immediately preceding June 1 under the accounts established in section 477A.37, subdivisions 2 and 3. (b) Beginning in 2025, tier I cities and counties shall submit a report annually, no later than December 1 of each year, to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency. The report must include documentation of the location of any unspent funds distributed under this section and of qualifying projects completed or planned with funds under this section. If a tier I city or county fails to submit a report, if a tier I city or county fails to spend funds deleted text begin within the timelinedeleted text end new text begin by the deadlinesnew text end imposed under subdivision 5, deleted text begin paragraph (b),deleted text end if a tier I city or county uses funds for a project that does not qualify under this section, or if a tier I city or county fails to meet its requirements of subdivision 5a, the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency shall notify the Department of Revenue and the cities and counties that must repay funds under paragraph (c) by February 15 of the following year. (c) By May 15, after receiving notice from the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency, a tier I city or county must pay to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency funds the city or county received under this section if the city or county: (1) fails to spend the funds deleted text begin within the time alloweddeleted text end new text begin by the deadlines imposednew text end under subdivision 5deleted text begin , paragraph (b)deleted text end ; (2) spends the funds on anything other than a qualifying project; (3) fails to submit a report documenting use of the funds; or (4) fails to meet the requirements of subdivision 5a. (d) The commissioner of revenue must stop distributing funds to a tier I city or county that requests in writing that the commissioner stop payment or that, in three consecutive years, the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency has reported, pursuant to paragraph (b), to have failed to use funds, misused funds, or failed to report on its use of funds. A request to stop payment under this paragraph must be submitted to the commissioner in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner on or before May 1 of the aids payable year the aid recipient wants the commissioner to stop payment of aid. The commissioner shall not stop payment based on a request received after May 1 until the next aids payable year. (e) The commissioner may resume distributing funds to a tier I city or county to which the commissioner has stopped payments in the year following the August 1 after the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency certifies that the city or county has submitted documentation of plans for a qualifying project. The commissioner may resume distributing funds to a tier I city or county to which the commissioner has stopped payments at the request of the city or county in the year following the August 1 after the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency certifies that the city or county has submitted documentation of plans for a qualifying project. (f) By June 1, any funds paid to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency under paragraph (c) must be deposited in the housing development fund. Funds deposited under this paragraph are appropriated to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for use on the family homeless prevention and assistance program under section 462A.204, the economic development and housing challenge program under section 462A.33, and the workforce and affordable homeownership development program under section 462A.38. Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.36, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Qualifying projects. (a) Qualifying projects shall include: (1) emergency rental assistance for households earning less than 80 percent of area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; (2) financial support to nonprofit affordable housing providers in their mission to provide safe, dignified, affordable and supportive housing; (3) outside the metropolitan counties as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 4, development of market rate residential rental properties, as defined in section 462A.39, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), if the relevant unit of government submits with the report required under subdivision 6 a resolution and supporting documentation showing that the area meets the requirements of section 462A.39, subdivision 4, paragraph (a); (4) projects designed for the purpose of construction, acquisition, rehabilitation, demolition or removal of existing structures, construction financing, permanent financing, interest rate reduction, refinancing, and gap financing of housing to provide affordable housing to households that have incomes which do not exceed, for homeownership projects, 115 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and, for rental housing projects, 80 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, except that the housing developed or rehabilitated with funds under this section must be affordable to the local work force; (5) financing the operations and management of financially distressed residential properties; (6) funding of supportive services or staff of supportive services providers for supportive housing as defined in section 462A.37, subdivision 1. Financial support to nonprofit housing providers to finance supportive housing operations may be awarded as a capitalized reserve or as an award of ongoing funding; and (7) deleted text begin costs of operatingdeleted text end emergency shelter deleted text begin facilitiesdeleted text end new text begin facility construction and operationsnew text end , including deleted text begin the costs of providing servicesdeleted text end new text begin service provisionnew text end . (b) Recipients must prioritize projects that provide affordable housing to households that have incomes that do not exceed, for homeownership projects, 80 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, and for rental housing projects, 50 percent of the greater of state or area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. Priority may be given to projects that: reduce disparities in home ownership; reduce housing cost burden, housing instability, or homelessness; improve the habitability of homes; create accessible housing; or create more energy- or water-efficient homes. (c) Gap financing is either: (1) the difference between the costs of the property, including acquisition, demolition, rehabilitation, and construction, and the market value of the property upon sale; or (2) the difference between the cost of the property and the amount the targeted household can afford for housing, based on industry standards and practices. (d) If aid under this section is used for demolition or removal of existing structures, the cleared land must be used for the construction of housing to be owned or rented by persons who meet the income limits of paragraph (a). (e) If an aid recipient uses the aid on new construction of a building containing more than four units, the loan recipient must construct, convert, or otherwise adapt the building to include: (1) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are accessible units, and each accessible unit includes at least one roll-in shower, water closet, and kitchen work surface meeting the requirements of section 1002 of the current State Building Code Accessibility Provisions for Dwelling Units in Minnesota; and (2) the greater of: (i) at least one unit; or (ii) at least five percent of units that are sensory-accessible units that include: (A) soundproofing between shared walls for first and second floor units; (B) no florescent lighting in units and common areas; (C) low-fume paint; (D) low-chemical carpet; and (E) low-chemical carpet glue in units and common areas. Nothing in this paragraph relieves a project funded by this section from meeting other applicable accessibility requirements. Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 477A.36, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Use of proceeds. (a) Any funds distributed under this section must be spent on a qualifying projectnew text begin , as described in subdivision 4new text end . If a tier I city or county demonstrates to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency that the tier I city or county cannot expend funds on a qualifying project by the deleted text begin deadlinedeleted text end new text begin deadlinesnew text end imposed by deleted text begin paragraph (b)deleted text end new text begin this subdivisionnew text end due to factors outside the control of the tier I city or county, funds shall be considered spent on a qualifying project if the funds are transferred to a local housing trust fund. Funds transferred to a local housing trust fund must be spent on a deleted text begin project or household that meets the affordability requirements of subdivision 4, paragraph (a)deleted text end new text begin qualifying project, as described in subdivision 4new text end . new text begin (b) If a Tribal Nation demonstrates to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency that the Tribal Nation cannot expend funds on a qualifying project by the deadline imposed by paragraph (c) due to factors outside the control of the Tribal Nation, funds shall be considered spent on a qualifying project if the funds are transferred to a Tribal housing fund overseen by the Tribal Nation. Funds transferred to a Tribal housing fund must be spent on a qualifying project, as described in subdivision 4. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Funds must be deleted text begin spent by December 31 in the third year following the year after deleted text end deleted text begin the aid was received. The requirements of this paragraph are satisfied if funds are:deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end committed to a qualifying project by December 31 deleted text begin indeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end the third year following the year deleted text begin afterdeleted text end the aid was receiveddeleted text begin ;deleted text end and deleted text begin (2)deleted text end expended by December 31 deleted text begin indeleted text end new text begin ofnew text end the fourth year following the year deleted text begin afterdeleted text end the aid was received. new text begin (d) Notwithstanding paragraph (c), aid that a recipient will spend on a qualifying affordable housing construction project under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (4), or a qualifying emergency shelter facility construction project under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clause (7), as documented in the most recent annual report submitted to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency under subdivision 6, must be committed to the project by December 31 of the fifth year following the year the aid was received and expended by December 31 of the sixth year following the year the aid was received. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end An aid recipient may not use aid funds to reimburse itself for prior expenditures. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Any program income generated from funds distributed under this section must be used on a qualifying projectnew text begin , as described in subdivision 4new text end . Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.36, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Conditions for receipt. (a) As a condition of receiving aid under this section, a recipient must commit to using money to supplement, not supplant, existing locally funded housing expenditures, so that the recipient is using the funds to create new or to expand existing housing programs. (b) In the annual report required under subdivision 6, anew text begin tier I city or countynew text end recipient must certify compliance with this subdivision, including an accounting of locally funded housing expenditures in the prior fiscal year. In deleted text begin an aiddeleted text end new text begin a tier I city or countynew text end recipient's first report to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency, the aid recipient must document its locally funded housing expenditures in the two prior fiscal years. If a recipient reduces one of its locally funded housing expenditures, the recipient must detail the expenditure, the amount of the reduction, and the reason for the reduction. The certification required under this paragraph must be made available publicly on the recipient's website. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.36, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Administration. (a) The commissioner of revenue must compute the amount of aid payable to each aid recipient under this section. Beginning with aids payable in calendar year 2024, before computing the amount of aid for counties and after receiving the report required by subdivision 3, paragraph (e), the commissioner shall compute the amount necessary to increase the amount in the account or accounts established under that paragraph to $1,250,000. The amount calculated under the preceding sentence shall be deducted from the amount available to counties for the purposes of certifying the amount of aid to be paid to counties in the following year. By August 1 of each year, the commissioner must certify the amount to be paid to each tier I city and county in the following year. The commissioner must pay statewide local housing aid to tier I cities and counties annually at the times provided in section 477A.015. Before paying the first installment of aid annually, the commissioner of revenue shall transfer to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency from the funds available for counties, for deposit in the account or accounts established under subdivision 3, paragraph (e), the amount computed in the prior year to be necessary to increase the amount in the account or accounts established under that paragraph to $1,250,000. (b) Beginning in 2025, aid recipients shall submit a report annually, no later than December 1 of each year, to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency. The report shall include documentation of the location of any unspent funds distributed under this section and of qualifying projects completed or planned with funds under this section. If an aid recipient fails to submit a report, fails to spend funds deleted text begin within the timelinedeleted text end new text begin by the deadlinesnew text end imposed under subdivision 5, deleted text begin paragraph (b),deleted text end uses funds for a project that does not qualify under this section, or if an aid recipient fails to meet the requirements of subdivision 5a, the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency shall notify the Department of Revenue and the aid recipient must repay funds under paragraph (c) by February 15 of the following year. (c) By May 15, after receiving notice from the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency, an aid recipient must pay to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency funds the aid recipient received under this section if the aid recipient: (1) fails to spend the funds deleted text begin within the time alloweddeleted text end new text begin by the deadlines imposednew text end under subdivision 5deleted text begin , paragraph (b)deleted text end ; (2) spends the funds on anything other than a qualifying project; (3) fails to submit a report documenting use of the funds; or (4) fails to meet the requirements of subdivision 5a. (d) The commissioner of revenue must stop distributing funds to an aid recipient that requests in writing that the commissioner stop payment or that the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency reports to have, in three consecutive years, failed to use funds, misused funds, or failed to report on its use of funds. A request to stop payment under this paragraph must be submitted to the commissioner in the form and manner prescribed by the commissioner on or before May 1 of the year prior to the aids payable year in which the aid recipient wants the commissioner to stop payment of aid. The commissioner shall not stop payment based on a request received after May 1 until aids payable based on certification in the following calendar year. (e) The commissioner may resume distributing funds to an aid recipient to which the commissioner has stopped payments in the year following the August 1 after the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency certifies that the city or county has submitted documentation of plans for a qualifying project. The commissioner may resume distributing funds to an aid recipient to which the commissioner has stopped payments at the request of the recipient in the year following the August 1 after the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency certifies that the recipient has submitted documentation of plans for a qualifying project. (f) By June 1, any funds paid to the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency under paragraph (c) must be deposited in the housing development fund. Funds deposited under this paragraph are appropriated to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for use on the family homeless prevention and assistance program under section 462A.204, the economic development and housing challenge program under section 462A.33, and the workforce and affordable homeownership development program under section 462A.38. (g) An eligible Tribal Nation may choose to receive an aid distribution under this section by submitting an application under this subdivision. An eligible Tribal Nation which has not received a distribution in a prior aids payable year may elect to begin participation in the program by submitting an application in the manner and form prescribed by the commissioner of revenue by January 15 of the aids payable year. In order to receive a distribution, an eligible Tribal Nation must certify to the commissioner of revenue the most recent estimate of the total number of enrolled members of the eligible Tribal Nation. The information must be annually certified by March 1 in the form prescribed by the commissioner of revenue. The commissioner of revenue must annually calculate and certify the amount of aid payable to each eligible Tribal Nation on or before August 1 of the aids payable year. The commissioner of revenue must pay statewide local housing aid to eligible Tribal Nations annually by December 27 of the year the aid is certified.